Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4807
Bonds.

In any proceeding under the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, the director and his or her deputies shall be responsible on their official bonds for the faithful performance of their duties. If the court deems it desirable for the protection of the assets, it may at any time require an additional bond from the director or his or her deputies, and such bond shall be paid for out of the assets of the insurer as a cost of administration.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 7.